Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6924
Employees; verification of status required; exclusions.

(1) The Director of Economic Development shall not approve or grant to any person any tax incentive under the Urban Redevelopment Act unless the taxpayer provides evidence satisfactory to the director that the taxpayer electronically verified the work eligibility status of all newly hired employees employed in Nebraska.

(2) For purposes of calculating any tax incentive available under the act, the director shall exclude hours worked and compensation paid to an employee that is not eligible to work in Nebraska as verified under subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 2021, LB544, § 24.